pt-BR: Forma do casco da canoa: Assimétrico; Fundo plano; Fundo redondo; V raso; Arco raso; Arco raso assimétrico; Simétrico; Fundo em V; Outro
ro-RO: Formă carenă de canoe: Asimetrică; Fund plat; Fund rotund; V superficial; Arcadă ușoară; Arcadă ușoară asimetrică; Simetrică; Fund în V; Altele
lt-LT: Kanojos korpuso forma: Asimetriškas; Plokščiadugnis; Apvaliadugnis; Plokščias V formos; Plokščia arka; Asimetriška plokščia arka; Simetriškas; V formos dugnas; Kita
fi: Kanootin rungon muoto: Epäsymmetrinen; Tasapohjainen; Pyöreäpohjainen; Matala V; Matala kaari; Matala kaari, epäsymmetrinen; Symmetrinen; V-pohja; Muu
it: Shapesdello scafo della canoa: Asimmetrico; Fondo piatto; Fondo rotondo; A V poco profondo; Arco ribassato; Arco ribassato asimmetrico; Simmetrico; Fondo a V; Altro
cs: Tvar trupu kánoe: Asymetrický; Ploché dno; Kulaté dno; Mělké V; Mělký oblouk; Asymetrický mělký oblouk; Symetrický; V-dno; Jiný
ru: Форма корпуса каноэ: Асимметричная; Плоское днище; Круглое днище; Пологое V-образное; Пологая арка; Асимметричная пологая арка; Симметричная; V-образное днище; Другое
nl: Kano romp vorm: Asymmetrisch; Platte bodem; Ronde bodem; Ondiepe V; Ondiepe boog; Ondiepe boog asymmetrisch; Symmetrisch; V-bodem; Overig
es: Forma del casco de la canoa: Asimétrico; Fondo plano; Fondo redondo; V poco profunda; Arco poco profundo; Arco asimétrico poco profundo; Simétrico; Fondo en V; Otro
fr: Forme de coque du canoë: Asymétrique; Fond plat; Fond rond; En V peu profond; En arc peu profond; En arc peu profond asymétrique; Symétrique; Fond en V; Autre
pt-PT: Formas de casco de canoa: Assimétrico; Fundo plano; Fundo redondo; V raso; Arco raso; Arco raso assimétrico; Simétrico; Fundo em V; Outro
de: Form des Kanurumpfs: Asymmetrisch; Flacher Boden; Runder Boden; Flacher V-Boden; Flacher Rundboden; Flacher Rundboden asymmetrisch; Symmetrisch; V-Boden; Sonstige
pl: Kształt kadłuba kajaka kanadyjskiego: Asymetryczny; Płaskodenne; Okrągłodenne; Płytkie V; Płytki łuk; Płytki łuk asymetryczny; Symetryczny; Dno w kształcie litery V; Inne
ko: 카누 선체 형상: 비대칭; 플랫 바텀; 라운드 바텀; 얕은 V자; 얕은 아치; 비대칭 얕은 아치; 대칭; V자 바텀; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik trupa kanua: Asimetrični; Ravno dno; Okruglo dno; Plitki V-oblik; Plitki luk; Asimetrični plitki luk; Simetrični; V-dno; Ostalo
nb: Kanohullformer: Asymmetrisk; Flat bunn; Rund bunn; Grunn V; Grunn bue; Grunn bue, asymmetrisk; Symmetrisk; V-bunn; Annet
sk-SK: Tvar trupu kanoe: Asymetrický; Ploché dno; Okrúhle dno; Plytké V; Mierny oblúk; Asymetrický mierny oblúk; Symetrický; V-dno; Iné
en: Canoe hull shape: Asymmetrical; Flat bottom; Round bottom; Shallow V; Shallow arch; Shallow arch asymmetrical; Symmetrical; V-bottom; Other
da: Kanoens skrogform: Asymmetrisk; Flad bund; Rund bund; Fladt V; Flad bue; Flad bue (asymmetrisk); Symmetrisk; V-bund; Andet
vi: Hình dạng thân thuyền canoe: Bất đối xứng; Đáy phẳng; Đáy tròn; Đáy chữ V nông; Vòm nông; Vòm nông bất đối xứng; Đối xứng; Đáy chữ V; Khác
tr: Kano gövde şekli: Asimetrik; Düz taban; Yuvarlak taban; Sığ V; Sığ kemer; Sığ kemer asimetrik; Simetrik; V taban; Diğer
ja: カヌーの船体Shapes: 非対称; フラットボトム; ラウンドボトム; シャローV; シャローアーチ; シャローアーチ非対称; 対称; Vボトム; その他
el: Σχήμα κύτους κανό: Ασύμμετρο; Επίπεδος πυθμένας; Στρογγυλός πυθμένας; Ρηχό V; Ρηχή αψίδα; Ασύμμετρη ρηχή αψίδα; Συμμετρικό; Πυθμένας σχήματος V; Άλλο
sv: Kanotens form: Asymmetrisk; Platt botten; Rund botten; Svagt V-formad; Svagt rundad; Svagt rundad asymmetrisk; Symmetrisk; V-botten; Övrigt
zh-CN: 独木舟船体形状: 非对称形; 平底; 圆底; 浅 V 形; 浅拱形; 非对称浅拱形; 对称形; V 形底; 其他
th: รูปทรงตัวเรือแคนู: อสมมาตร; ท้องแบน; ท้องกลม; รูปตัววีตื้น; ท้องโค้งตื้น; ท้องโค้งตื้นแบบอสมมาตร; สมมาตร; ท้องรูปตัววี; อื่นๆ
hu: Kenuhéj alakja: Aszimmetrikus; Lapos aljú; Kerek aljú; Lapos V-alakú; Lapos ívű; Lapos ívű, aszimmetrikus; Szimmetrikus; V-aljú; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika trupa kanuja: Asimetrično; Ravno dno; Okroglo dno; Plitvi V; Plitek lok; Asimetričen plitek lok; Simetrično; V-dno; Drugo
bg-BG: Форма на корпуса на кану: Асиметрична; Плоско дъно; Заоблено дъно; Плитко V-образно; Плитка арка; Асиметрична плитка арка; Симетрична; V-образно дъно; Други
zh-TW: 獨木舟船體形狀: 不對稱; 平底; 圓底; 淺 V 型; 淺拱; 不對稱淺拱; 對稱; V 型底; 其他